src-fst-morphology-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
UDMURT Pronoun inflection

Udmurt adjectives inflect for:

* Number
* Case
* Determinativity (Absolutive / Determinative)
* Comparative (TODO: can comparative co-occur with other stuff?)

###  Determinative notes

When an adjective occurs in determinative, it must agree for number and case.
However, when determinative co-occurs with certain cases, these cases
have alternate forms.

The cases with alternate forms are:

* Accusative singular, plural
* Inessive singular, plural
* Illative singular, plural
* Elative singular, plural

Note that these alternative suffixes have palatal and non-palatal versions

|  Nom.   | бадӟым-ез гурт          | бадӟым-ъёс-ыз гурт-ъёс
|  Iness. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-ын      | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ын
|  Illat. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-э       | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ы
|  Elat.  | бадӟым-ысьты-з гурт-ысь | бадӟым-ъёс-ысьты-з гурт-ъёс-ысь

|  Nom.   | пичи-ез бакча           | пичи-ос-ыз бакча-ос
|  Iness. | пичи-я-з бакча-ын       | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ын
|  Illat. | пичи-я-з бакча-е        | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ы
|  Elat.  | пичи-ысьты-з бакча-ысь  | пичи-ос-ысьты-з бакча-ос-ысь

TODO: ordering of suffixes sometimes differs? Compare this with possession morph.

words with this contlex have not been examined

* **LEXICON PERS** 
* **мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1:м PRON-PERS-SG1_ ;** ...

мон:м

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-udm/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
